Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 88. Health Care Providers Insurance.

Secs. 21.88.010,
21.88.020.
Purpose of this chapter; corporation created. [Repealed, § 9 ch 14 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 21.88.030.
Liability of a governor, officer, or employee.

A governor, officer, or employee or former governor, officer, or employee of the corporation is not liable for civil damages or a criminal fine by reason of the person’s act or omission as a governor, officer, or employee of the corporation, or by reason of the act or omission of the corporation, the board of governors, officers, or employees unless (1) the person acts with actual knowledge that the person was acting outside the scope of the person’s authority, (2) at the time of the act or omission the person was acting or failing to act for a purpose which the person knew was not in the best interests of the corporation, or (3) with respect to a criminal act, the person had actual knowledge or should have known the person’s act was unlawful. If a claim or action is brought against a person entitled to the protection of this section, the claim or action will be defended by the state, except that the person shall reimburse the state for the cost to the state of the person’s defense if the provisions of (1), (2), or (3) of this section apply to the person.

History.

(§ 41 ch 102 SLA 1976; am §§ 4, 5 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 103 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 14 SLA 1991; am § 32 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Secs. 21.88.040 — 21.88.090.
Medical Indemnity Corporation of Alaska. [Repealed, § 9 ch 14 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 21.88.095.
Premium tax offset.

If the company to which the assets and liabilities of the corporation are transferred does not write premiums for two consecutive years that total less than 35 percent of all premiums written in the state for physicians’ medical malpractice insurance or does not write premiums for one calendar year that total less than 20 percent of all premiums written in the state for physicians’ medical malpractice insurance, the company may carry forward and offset against the company’s premium tax liability to the state the amount by which the aggregate claims paid on reinsurance assumed under the transfer exceeds aggregate reserves on the same business established at the date of the transfer of the assets and liabilities of the corporation.

History.

(§ 16 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 14 SLA 1991)

Secs. 21.88.110 — 21.88.180.
Joint Underwriting Association.
[Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 21.88.210.
Fund established. [Repealed, § 9 ch 14 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 21.88.900.
Definition.

In this chapter, “corporation” means the Medical Indemnity Corporation of Alaska.

History.

(§ 41 ch 102 SLA 1976; am §§ 19, 20, 40 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 46 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 131 SLA 1986; am §§ 29, 30 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 5 ch 40 SLA 1989; am §§ 12, 13 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 14 SLA 1991)